Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1208
Authority, defined.

Authority means the State of Nebraska or any agency, county, city, village, or other political subdivision thereof, except as otherwise excluded herein. Authority does not include public power suppliers, state courts having jurisdiction over an authority, or an entity that does not have zoning or permit-granting authority.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 8.